Washington statutes.
RCW 35.106.030

Program—No prohibition against hiring or renting to person based on criminal history.

A crime-free rental housing program may not prohibit a landlord from hiring or renting to a person solely because of the person's criminal history.

[ 2010 c 132 s 4.]